Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Standards of Conduct

§ 17-16-830.
General standards for directors.

Each member of the board of directors, when discharging the duties of a director, shall act:

In good faith; and

In a manner he reasonably believes to be in or at least not opposed to the best interests of the corporation.

The members of the board of directors or a committee of the board, when becoming informed in connection with their decision making function or devoting attention to their oversight function, shall discharge their duties with the care that a person in a like position would reasonably believe appropriate under similar circumstances.

In discharging board or committee duties a director shall disclose, or cause to be disclosed, to the other board or committee members information not already known by them but known by the director to be material to the discharge of their decision making or oversight functions, except that disclosure is not required to the extent that the director reasonably believes that doing so would violate a duty imposed under law, a legally enforceable obligation of confidentiality or a professional ethics rule.

In discharging board or committee duties a director who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to rely on the performance by any of the persons specified in paragraph (f)(i) or (iii) of this section to whom the board may have delegated, formally or informally by course of conduct, the authority or duty to perform one (1) or more of the board’s functions that are delegable under applicable law.

In discharging board or committee duties a director who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by any of the persons specified in subsection (f) of this section.

A director is entitled to rely in accordance with subsections (d) and (e) of this section on:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the functions performed or the information, opinions, reports or statements provided;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the director reasonably believes are matters:

Within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

As to which the particular person merits confidence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, a director, in determining what he reasonably believes to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, shall consider the interests of the corporation’s shareholders and, in his discretion, may consider any of the following:

The interests of the corporation’s employees, suppliers, creditors and customers;

The economy of the state and nation;

The impact of any action upon the communities in or near which the corporation’s facilities or operations are located;

The long-term interests of the corporation and its shareholders, including the possibility that those interests may be best served by the continued independence of the corporation; and

Any other factors relevant to promoting or preserving public or community interests.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section relating to duties of members of the board of directors; added (f) through (j); and made related and stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

No violation of good faith duty. —

Shareholder's actions, while not ideal, did not violate any possible duty of good faith, and acting in his capacity as an employee, he complied with a non-compete clause in his employment contract by buying it out, the contractually agreed upon method of damage mitigation.
Orthopaedics of Jackson Hole v. Ford, 2011 WY 50, 250 P.3d 1092,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Mar. 21, 2011).

Cited

in

Ravenswood Inv. Co., L.P. v. Bishop Capital Corp., 374 F. Supp. 2d 1055, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12932 (2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ethical Considerations When Representing Organizations,” see 3 Wyo. L. Rev. 581 (2003).

§ 17-16-831.
Standards of liability for directors.

A director shall not be liable to the corporation or its shareholders for any decision to take or not to take action, or any failure to take any action including abstaining from voting after full disclosure, as a director, unless the party asserting liability in a proceeding establishes that:

No defense interposed by the director based on the following precludes liability:

Any provision in the articles of incorporation authorized by W.S. 17-16-202(b)(iv); or

The protection afforded by W.S.

17-16-861

for action taken in compliance with W.S.

17-16-862

or

17-16-863

; or

The protection afforded by W.S.

17-16-870

; and

The challenged conduct consisted or was the result of:

Action not in good faith; or

A decision:

Which the director did not reasonably believe to be in or at least not opposed to the best interests of the corporation; or

As to which the director was not informed to an extent the director reasonably believed appropriate in the circumstances; or

Lack of objectivity due to the director’s familial, financial or business relationship with, or a lack of independence due to the director’s domination or control by, another person having a material interest in the challenged conduct:

Which relationship or which domination or control could reasonably be expected to have affected the director’s judgment respecting the challenged conduct in a manner adverse to the corporation; and

After a reasonable expectation to such effect has been established, the director shall not have established that the challenged conduct was reasonably believed by the director to be in or at least not opposed to the best interests of the corporation; or

A sustained failure of the director to devote attention to ongoing oversight of the business and affairs of the corporation, or a failure to devote timely attention, by making or causing to be made appropriate inquiry, when particular facts and circumstances of significant concern materialize that would alert a reasonably attentive director to the need therefore; or

Receipt of a financial benefit to which the director was not entitled or any other breach of the director’s duties to deal fairly with the corporation and its shareholders that is actionable under applicable law.

The party seeking to hold the director liable:

For money damages, shall also have the burden of establishing that:

Harm to the corporation or its shareholders has been suffered; and

The harm suffered was proximately caused by the director’s challenged conduct.

For other money payment under a legal remedy, such as compensation for the unauthorized use of corporate assets, shall also have whatever burden of proof may be called for to establish that the payment sought is appropriate in the circumstances; or

For other money payment under an equitable remedy, such as profit recovery by or disgorgement to the corporation, shall also have whatever burden of proof may be called for to establish that the equitable remedy sought is appropriate in the circumstances.

Nothing contained in this section shall:

In any instance where fairness is at issue, such as consideration of the fairness of a transaction to the corporation under W.S.

17-16-861

(b)(iii), alter the burden of proving the fact or lack of fairness otherwise applicable;

Alter the fact or lack of liability of a director under another section of this act, such as the provisions governing the consequences of an unlawful distribution under W.S.

17-16-833

or a transactional interest under W.S.

17-16-861

; or

Affect any rights to which the corporation or a shareholder may be entitled under another statute of this state or the United States.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 17-16-832.
[Reserved.]

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-833.
Director's liability for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution in excess of what may be authorized and made pursuant to W.S.

17-16-640

or 17-16-1409(a) is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating W.S.

17-16-640

or 17-16-1409(a) if the party asserting liability establishes that when taking the action the director did not comply with W.S.

17-16-830

.

A director held liable under subsection (a) of this section for an unlawful distribution is entitled to:

Contribution from every other director who could be held liable under subsection (a) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

Recoupment from each shareholder of the pro-rata portion of the amount of the unlawful distribution the shareholder accepted knowing the distribution was made in violation of W.S.

17-16-640

or 17-16-1409(a).

A proceeding to enforce:

The liability of a director under subsection (a) of this section is barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date:

On which the effect of the distribution was measured under W.S. 17-16-640(e) or (g);

As of which the violation of W.S. 17-16-640(a) occurred as the consequence of disregard of a restriction in the articles of incorporation; or

On which the distribution of assets to shareholders under W.S. 17-16-1409(a) was made.

Contribution or recoupment under subsection (b) of this section is barred unless it is commenced within one (1) year after the liability of the claimant has been finally adjudicated under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, inserting internal references; adding (c)(i) and (c)(ii); and making related and stylistic changes.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Personal liability of directors on corporate checks issued against insufficient funds, 47 ALR3d 1250.